Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-104
Book register; entries.

The librarian shall cause to be kept a register of all books issued and returned at the time they shall be so issued and returned. None of the books, except the laws, journals, and reports of this state, which may be taken from the library, shall be detained more than ten days, and all the books taken out by officers or members of the Legislature shall be returned at the close of the session.

Laws 1871, § 6, p. 52;

R.S.1913, § 3781;

C.S.1922, § 3174;

C.S.1929, § 51-104;

R.S.1943, § 51-104.